Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.902

Construction—1987 c 4.

This act shall not be construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended or repealed in this act or under any rule, regulation, or order adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any proceeding instituted under those sections.

[ 1987 c 4 s 48.]